Florida, session 2026, HB489.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (13) through (36) and subsections
(37) through (45) of section 420.503, Florida Statutes, are
renumbered as subsections (14) through (37) and subsections (39)
through (47), respectively, subsection (8) and present
subsections (16), (17), and (41) are amended, and new
subsections (13) and (38) are added to that section, to read:
420.503 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
(8) "Community housing development organization" means a
nonprofit organization that has among its purposes the provision
of affordable housing for low-income families and moderate-
income families, maintains accountability to low-income
community residents, has demonstrated the capacity to carry out
affordable housing activities, and has a history of serving the
local community.
(13) "Demonstrated capacity" means the requisite skill,
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 489 2026
experience, and credit worthiness of a provider of affordable
housing projects to successfully construct or rehabilitate
affordable housing. Requisite skill, experience, and credit
worthiness includes, but is not limited to, the completion of at
least three affordable housing projects in the United States,
one of which must have been completed in this state, within the
preceding 5 years. Each affordable housing project used to
demonstrate capacity must involve a qualifying principal acting
in the capacity of a qualifying principal in each affordable
housing project.
(17)(16) "Elderly" means persons 62 years of age or older;
however, this definition does not prohibit housing from being
deemed housing for the elderly as defined in subsection (22)
(21) if such housing otherwise meets the requirements of
subsection (22) (21).
(18)(17) "Eligible housing provider" means a for-profit
developer or not-for-profit developer or a community housing
development organization with at least one qualifying principal
having the demonstrated the capacity to construct or
rehabilitate affordable housing.
(38) "Qualifying principal" means one or more persons
owning at least 25 percent of a legally formed corporation,
association, joint venture, or partnership.
(43)(41) "Sponsor" means any individual, association,
corporation, joint venture, partnership, trust, local
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb489-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 489 2026
government, or other legal entity or any combination thereof
which:
(a) Has the demonstrated capacity to construct or
rehabilitate affordable housing.
(b)(a) Has been approved by the corporation as qualified
to own, construct, acquire, rehabilitate, reconstruct, operate,
lease, manage, or maintain a project.; and
(c)(b) Except for a local government, has agreed to
subject itself to the regulatory powers of the corporation.
Section 2. Subsection (2) of section 420.628, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
420.628 Affordable housing for children and young adults
leaving foster care; legislative findings and intent.—
(2) Young adults who leave the child welfare system meet
the definition of eligible persons under ss. 420.503(19) and
420.9071(11) ss. 420.503(18) and 420.9071(11) for affordable
housing, and are encouraged to participate in federal, state,
and local affordable housing programs. Students deemed to be
eligible occupants under 26 U.S.C. s. 42(i)(3)(D) shall be
considered eligible persons for purposes of all projects funded
under this chapter.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb489-00